Utah statutes.
67-19-6.   Responsibilities of the executive director.

(1)  The executive director shall:

(a)  develop, implement, and administer a statewide program of human resource management that will:

(i)  aid in the efficient execution of public policy;

(ii)  foster careers in public service for qualified employees; and

(iii)  render assistance to state agencies in performing their missions;

(b)  design and administer the state pay plan;

(c)  design and administer the state classification system and procedures for determining schedule assignments;

(d)  design and administer the state recruitment and selection system;

(e) administer agency human resource practices and ensure compliance with federal law, state law, and state human resource rules, including equal employment opportunity;

(f)  consult with agencies on decisions concerning employee corrective action and discipline;

(g)  maintain central personnel records;

(h)  perform those functions necessary to implement this chapter unless otherwise assigned or prohibited;

(i)  perform duties assigned by the governor or statute;

(j)  adopt rules for human resource management according to the procedures of Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act;

(k)  establish and maintain a management information system that will furnish the governor, the Legislature, and agencies with current information on authorized positions, payroll, and related matters concerning state human resources;

(l) conduct research and planning activities to:

(i)  determine and prepare for future state human resource needs;

(ii)  develop methods for improving public human resource management; and

(iii)  propose needed policy changes to the governor;

(m)  study the character, causes, and extent of discrimination in state employment and develop plans for its elimination through programs consistent with federal and state laws governing equal employment opportunity in employment;

(n)  when requested by counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions of the state, provide technical service and advice on human resource management at a charge determined by the executive director;

(o)  establish compensation policies and procedures for early voluntary retirement;

(p)  confer with the heads of other agencies about human resource policies and procedures;

(q)  submit an annual report to the governor and the Legislature; and

(r)  assist with the development of a vacant position report required under Subsection 63J-1-201(2)(b)(v).

(2) (a)  After consultation with the governor and the heads of other agencies, the executive director shall establish and coordinate statewide training programs.

(b)  The programs developed under this Subsection (2) shall have application to more than one agency.

(c)  The department may not establish training programs that train employees to perform highly specialized or technical jobs and tasks.

(3) (a) (i)  The department may collect fees for training as authorized by this Subsection (3).

(ii)  Training funded from General Fund appropriations shall be treated as a separate program within the department budget.

(iii)  All money received from fees under this section will be accounted for by the department as a separate user driven training program.

(iv)  The user training program includes the costs of developing, procuring, and presenting training and development programs, and other associated costs for these programs.

(b) (i)  Funds remaining at the end of the fiscal year in the user training program are nonlapsing.

(ii)  Each year, as part of the appropriations process, the Legislature shall review the amount of nonlapsing funds remaining at the end of the fiscal year and may, by statute, require the department to lapse a portion of the funds.

